District of Columbia statutes.
47-1345

Sale of real property subject to possessory interest.

(a)

Whether or not any real property subject to sale under this chapter is subject to an estate for life, or a lease or ground rent for a term (with renewals) that is at least 30 years, the Mayor shall sell the entire fee simple estate; provided, that after the judgment of foreclosure of the right of redemption, no claim for rent unpaid, due, or accruing before the date of the judgment of foreclosure of the right of redemption shall be made by the purchaser (or assignee).

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or any other provision to the contrary, when a real property subject to sale under this chapter is subject to a ground lease and the ground lessor is the District of Columbia, or an instrumentality of the District, the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, or an entity whose real property is exempt from real property taxation or the enforced collection thereof under the laws of the United States of America, the Mayor shall sell the real property’s improvements only. Any additional representation related to what is being sold shall be ineffectual and shall not affect the validity of the sale.

(c)

The termination of claims on real property sold under this section shall not foreclose any personal claims against previous holders of the interest sold for any damages including rent unpaid, due, or accruing before the date of the judgment of foreclosure.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(c)(10), 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7102(c)(10), 7104, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have deleted “his” preceding “assignee” at the end of (a); inserted present (b); redesignated former (b) as (c); and in (c), deleted “subsection (a) of” preceding “this section”, inserted “any damages including”, deleted “of the right of redemption” at the end, and made minor stylistic changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote this section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(10) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(10) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7112(c)(10) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(10) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(10) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.